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DTC P07 10/38TransmissionFluidTemperatureSensor”A”
Circuit

DTC P07 12/38TransmissionFluidTemperatureSensor”A”
Circuit Low Input

DTC P07 13/38TransmissionFluidTemperatureSensor”A”
Circuit High Input

DTC P2743/38 Transmission Fluid Temperature Sensor ”B”
Circuit High Input

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
The ATF temperature sensor converts fluid temperature into a resistance value which is input into the Engine
and ECT ECU.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

P0710/38

(a) and (b) is detected momentary within 0.5 sec. when neither
P0712orP07 13 isnotdetected ( 1−tripdetection logic)
(a)ATF temperaturesensor resistance is less than79 ��

(b)ATF temperaturesensor resistance ismore than 156k ��

HINT:
Wthin0.5sec. themalfunctionswitches from(a) to (b)or from
(b) to (a)

SOpenorshort inATF temperaturesensorNo. 1 circuit
SATFtemperaturesensorNo. 1

P0712/38
ATFtemperaturesensor resistance is less than79 �� for0.5
sec.ormore ( 1−tripdetection logic)

p
SEngineandECTECU

P0713/38
DTCisdetected for0.5sec.ormore ( 1−tripdetection logic)
ATF temperaturesensor resistance ismore than 156k �� after
startedengine for 15minutesormore

P2743/38
DTCisdetected for0.5sec.ormore ( 1−tripdetection logic)
ATF temperaturesensor resistance ismore than 156k �� after
startedengine for 15minutesormore

SOpen inATFtemperaturesensorNo.2circuit
SATFtemperaturesensorNo.2

SEngineandECTECU
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WIRING DIAGRAM

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Checktransmissionwire.

PREPARATION:
Disconnect the transmission wire connector from the transmis-
sion.
CHECK:
(a)Measure the resistancebetween terminalsOT+andOT −.
(b) Measure the resistance between terminals OT2+ and

OT2−.
OK:

79 � − 156k �

CHECK:
(a)Measure resistancebetween terminalsOT+andOT − of

the transmission wire connector and body ground.
(b)Measure resistancebetween terminalsOT2+andOT2 −

of the transmission wire connector and body ground.
OK:

Resistance: 1 M� orhigher

NG Replace the transmission wire (ATF tempera-
ture sensor).

OK
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2 Measure resistance between terminal THO1, THO2 and E2 of Engine and ECT
ECU connector.

PREPARATION:
(a) Connect the transmission wire connector.
(b) Disconnect the connector of the Engine and ECT ECU.
CHECK:
(a) Measure the resistance between terminals THO1 and E2.
(b) M easur e t he r esist ance bet ween t er m inals THO 2 and

E2.
OK:

79 � − 156 k�
CHECK:
Measure resistance between terminals THO1, THO2 and E2 of
the Engine and ECT ECU connector and body ground.
OK:

Resistance: 1 M � or higher

NG Repair or replace the harness or connector
(See page IN−38).

OK

Check and replace the Engine and ECT ECU
(See page IN−38).


